apertium-es-ast.post2-ast.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="test"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

   <pardef n="vocals">
      <e>
        <i>a</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>e</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>i</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>o</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>u</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>è</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>á</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>é</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>í</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ó</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ú</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>â</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ê</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>î</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ô</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>h</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>A</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>E</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>I</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>O</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>U</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>È</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>Á</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>É</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>Í</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>Ó</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>Ú</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>Â</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>Ê</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>Î</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>Ô</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>H</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>



<section id="main" type="standard">

       <e>
            <p>
		<l><a/></l>
		<r></r>
	    </p>
	    <re>[A-Za-z]*[AaEeIiOoUuáéíóú]</re>
	    <p>
	    <l><b/><a/><a/>el</l>
	    <r>'l</r>
	    </p>
            <p>
		<l><b/><a/></l>
		<r><b/></r>
	    </p>
	    <re>[BCDFGHJKLMNPQRSTVWXYZbcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxyz][A-Za-z]*</re>
      </e>


</section>

</dictionary>
